Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2180.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Affordable Housing Land Acquisition Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"County." The county where a State correctional institution is located or where a majority of a State correctional institution is located."Department." The Department of Corrections of the Commonwealth."State correctional institution." A State correctional 123456789101112131415161718 institution as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions) that is permanently closing at the direction of the department according to the act of October 24, 2018 (P.L.813, No.133), known as the Public Safety Facilities Act.Section 3. Land transfer to county.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall provide written notice to the county if real estate of a State correctional institution is offered for sale. Notice shall include the county's option to be conveyed acreage, as provided under subsection (b), for no consideration.(b) Land reserve.--If the real estate of a State correctional institution is offered for sale, 2% of the total acreage, including public road frontage or access to a public road, shall be reserved for transfer to the county for the sole purpose of constructing and leasing affordable housing.(c) Duty of county.--A county may accept the conveyance of the acreage described under subsection (b) if, not later than 60 days after receiving notice under subsection (a), the county submits to the department a resolution passed by a majority of the county commissioners stating the county's acceptance of the real estate and a detailed plan for the development of the land, including the number of affordable housing units to be constructed and leased.(d) Transfer.--After all right, title and ownership has been conveyed from the department to the county in accordance with this section, the county shall, not later than five years after the date of the recording of the deed, begin permitting for the construction of affordable housing units and must have units available for lease not later than 10 years after the date of the recording of the deed. Affordable housing must be made 20260HB2180PN2834 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available for lease within the 10-year time frame or the real estate parcel shall revert to the Commonwealth.(e) Rejection by county.--If the county does not accept the real estate described under subsection (b), the real estate parcel reverts to the Commonwealth.Section 4. Application.This act shall apply to the sale of real estate on which a State correctional institution is located on or after the effective date of this section.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2180PN2834 - 3 - 1234567891011